Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.030

Contents of collective bargaining agreements—Execution.

(1) The parties to a collective bargaining agreement shall reduce the agreement to writing and both shall execute it.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 41.58.070 and 41.80.020, a collective bargaining agreement shall contain provisions that:

(a) Provide for a grievance procedure that culminates with final and binding arbitration of all disputes arising over the interpretation or application of the collective bargaining agreement and that is valid and enforceable under its terms when entered into in accordance with this chapter; and

(b) Require processing of disciplinary actions or terminations of employment of employees covered by the collective bargaining agreement entirely under the procedures of the collective bargaining agreement. Any employee, when fully reinstated, shall be guaranteed all employee rights and benefits, including back pay, sick leave, vacation accrual, and retirement and federal old age, survivors, and disability insurance act credits, but without back pay for any period of suspension.

(3)(a) If a collective bargaining agreement between an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative is concluded after the termination date of the previous collective bargaining agreement between the employer and an employee organization representing the same bargaining units, the effective date of the collective bargaining agreement may be the day after the termination of the previous collective bargaining agreement, and all benefits included in the new collective bargaining agreement, including wage or salary increases, may accrue beginning with that effective date.

(b) If a collective bargaining agreement between an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative is concluded after the termination date of the previous collective bargaining agreement between the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative representing different bargaining units, the effective date of the collective bargaining agreement may be the day after the termination date of whichever previous collective bargaining agreement covering one or more of the units terminated first, and all benefits included in the new collective bargaining agreement, including wage or salary increases, may accrue beginning with that effective date.

[ 2021 c 13 s 8; 2002 c 354 s 304.]